Georgia statutes. TITLE 12 CONSERVATION AND NATURAL RESOURCES
PART 1 J EKYLL ISLAND-STATE PARK AUTHORITY
12-3-243.1. Master plan as to Jekyll Island; maintenance; contents; adherence to plan; amendments.

The authority shall maintain a master plan for the management, preservation, protection, and development of Jekyll Island. The master plan shall delineate, based upon aerial survey, the present and permitted future uses of the land area of Jekyll Island and shall designate areas to be managed as environmentally sensitive, historically sensitive, and active use areas.

The authority, in the exercise of its authority to develop, manage, preserve, and protect Jekyll Island, shall be guided by and shall adhere to the master plan as the same may from time to time be amended as provided in subsection (c) of this Code section.

The authority may, from time to time, amend the master plan but only in compliance with the following procedure:

Any proposed amendment to the master plan shall be described in written form and, if capable of such description, in visual form and presented publicly at a regular meeting of the authority;

After the proposed amendment is presented publicly at a regular meeting of the authority, a brief summary of the proposed amendment shall be advertised in the legal organs of Glynn and Fulton counties, distributed to the media by news release, and published in appropriate publications of the authority. Each such advertisement, news release, and publication shall also contain:

The time and place of the public hearing on the proposed amendment, which public hearing shall be held no earlier than 15 days after the latest publication of the advertisement in the legal organ of Glynn or Fulton County as required by this paragraph;

Directions as to the manner of receiving comments from the public regarding the proposed amendment; and

The date on which the meeting of the authority at which the proposed amendment will be considered for approval or rejection, which meeting shall not be held any sooner than 30 days after the meeting of the authority at which the proposed amendment was announced pursuant to paragraph (1) of this subsection;

The authority shall transmit by certified mail or personal service copies of the information required by paragraph (2) of this subsection and a complete copy of the proposed amendment to the Speaker of the House, President of the Senate, members of the Jekyll Island - State Park Authority Oversight Committee, and Office of Legislative Counsel at least 60 days prior to the date of the meeting at which the proposed amendment will be considered. The presiding officers of each house, or the Office of Legislative Counsel if a presiding officer is unavailable, shall then provide copies to any member of the General Assembly who makes, or has made, a standing written request;

In the event the Jekyll Island - State Park Authority Oversight Committee files an objection to a proposed amendment to the master plan with the chairperson of the authority prior to the authority's taking action on the proposed amendment, then the same shall be stayed. Thereafter, by introduction of a resolution to consider the committee's objection within the first 30 days of the next regular session of the General Assembly, the objection may be considered for ratification by the General Assembly. In the event the resolution is adopted by a vote of two-thirds of the members of each branch, the amendment to the master plan shall not be adopted by the authority. In the event the resolution is ratified by a vote of less than two-thirds of the members of either house, the resolution shall be submitted to the Governor for approval or veto. In the event the resolution fails to pass both houses or is vetoed by the Governor, the amendment to the master plan may be adopted by the authority and the stay of the committee shall be lifted. In the event of the Governor's approval of the resolution, the amendment to the master plan shall be prohibited;

Any proposed development of the 78 acres available for development under subparagraph (a)(1)(B) of Code Section

12-3-243

shall be surveyed and marked at least seven days prior to the public hearing required by paragraph (2) of this subsection in such a fashion as to be readily discernible on the ground by members of the public; and

At the meeting of the authority which has been identified in the advertisement required by paragraph (2) of this subsection as the meeting to consider the approval or rejection of the proposed amendment, the authority shall consider in an open and public meeting the proposed amendment to the master plan which, if approved, shall become a part of the master plan, subject, however, to the provisions of paragraph (4) of this subsection.

(Code 1981, §

12-3-243

.1, enacted by Ga. L. 1995, p. 105, § 13; Ga. L. 1996, p. 6, § 12; Ga. L. 2001, p. 4, § 12; Ga. L. 2007, p. 711, § 8/HB 214; Ga. L. 2014, p. 64, § 3/HB 715; Ga. L. 2014, p. 69, § 3/SB 296.)

Editor's notes.

- Ga. L. 2007, p. 711,

§

1/HB 214, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: "The Georgia General Assembly finds that Jekyll Island is home to some of the state's most treasured natural and cultural resources and it is the expressed intent of this body to ensure the preservation of these resources for the enjoyment of all Georgians now and for future generations to come. For this reason, the state shall continue its commitment
that not less than 65 percent of the land area of Jekyll Island which lies above water at mean high tide shall remain undeveloped. Jekyll Island proudly displays one of Georgia's
largest stretches of barrier island property. It is the expressed intent of this body that the beach areas of Jekyll Island will remain free and open for the use of the people of the state. Commercial improvement is intended to better existing and future development of the remaining 35 percent of Jekyll Island while retaining public access to the beaches for the pleasure of all of Georgia's citizens. The General Assembly further finds that the deteriorating conditions of public and commercial facilities is of great interest to the legislature and to the public and that by significantly extending the existing lease authority for the island's property, the state will thereby help to secure and encourage future investments and provide a basis for long-term revitalization of the island. Jekyll Island is recognized by this body as 'Georgia's Jewel,' and its remarkable beauties are hereby preserved so that they may continue to shine for all citizens of Georgia."

Law reviews.

-
For annual survey on administrative law, see 66 Mercer L. Rev. 1 (2014). For article on the 2014 amendment of this Code section, see 31 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 1 (2014).

12-3-244. Subdivision, improvement, lease, or sale of island by authority - Sale and lease restrictions.

The leasing and sale of subdivided lots shall be under restrictive limitations as to the use, style, and character of the structures allowable thereon and such other limitations as the authority may deem wise. Any and all such restrictions may be incorporated in the leases and deeds as covenants and warranties and may, at the discretion of the authority, provide for termination and forfeiture upon breach. In the event of a breach of any such covenants and warranties, the authority is empowered to take such action as shall further and preserve its own best interest and the best interest of the state.

(Ga. L. 1950, p. 152, § 11; Ga. L. 1951, p. 782, § 4; Ga. L. 1952, p. 276, § 2; Ga. L. 1953, Jan.-Feb. Sess., p. 261, § 3; Ga. L. 1957, p. 608, § 3.)

12-3-245. Subdivision, improvement, lease, or sale of island by authority - Term of leases; assignment; preservation, continuance, and survival of rights and privileges.

The leasing of the subdivided lots shall be for not more than 99 years. Such leases as the authority shall designate may be made freely assignable, subject to all the liabilities, obligations, and duties imposed upon the lessee by the authority in its original lease. In its leasehold conveyance or rental contracts, the authority may create and provide for the preservation of such rights and privileges in the present or future security grantees, mortgagees, or other lenders upon the security of the lessee's or tenant's rights, as the authority may deem wise. Such rights and privileges, when created, may also provide for their continuance or survival after termination or forfeiture of the original leasehold or rental contract.

(Ga. L. 1950, p. 152, § 11; Ga. L. 1951, p. 782, § 4; Ga. L. 1952, p. 276, § 2; Ga. L. 1953, Jan.-Feb. Sess., p. 261, § 3; Ga. L. 1957, p. 608, § 3.)

12-3-246. Subdivision, improvement, lease, or sale of island by authority - Limitation as to number of lots to be leased or sold to one party.

Subject to the exceptions provided in subsections (b), (c), (d), and (e) of this Code section, no person, partnership, or corporation except the authority may, during the life of the authority, hold under lease or by deed or any combination of leases and deeds a total of more than three lots in the residential subdivisions made on Jekyll Island by the authority.

No violation of the limitation provided in subsection (a) of this Code section by any party shall in any wise affect the good and sufficient title of any bona fide assignee or transferee or any subsequent assignee or transferee thereof.

The limitation provided in subsection (a) of this Code section shall not apply to any bank, insurance company, building and loan association, mortgage loan company, or federal or state lending agency which may be holding lots under lease or by deed or under any combination of leases and deeds by virtue of foreclosure of loans made upon the security or improvements erected or existing on such lots.

The authority may waive the limitation provided in subsection (a) of this Code section as regards groups of not more than 25 lots if the lessee or owner thereof is a person or a corporation or other business enterprise engaged in the construction and sale of houses, and such entity covenants to erect houses upon the lots so leased or owned and to sell and assign all lots so leased or owned as improved within a reasonable period of time as determined by the authority.

The authority may waive the limitation provided in subsection (a) of this Code section as regards groups of not more than 25 lots when the lessee or owner thereof covenants to erect or causes to be erected a shopping center or business block or housing project thereon which, when completed, shall be offered for rental or sale, unit by unit, upon such terms and conditions as may be agreed to by the authority.

(Ga. L. 1950, p. 152, § 11; Ga. L. 1951, p. 782, § 4; Ga. L. 1952, p. 276, § 2; Ga. L. 1953, Jan.-Feb. Sess., p. 261, § 3; Ga. L. 1957, p. 608, § 3.)

12-3-247. Subdivision, improvement, lease, or sale of island by authority - Conditions on sale of residential lots; sale of commercial property; sale price; payment of state's share into state treasury.

The authority shall not sell any residential lot unless obligated to do so under the terms of a valid lease agreement entered into prior to May 30, 2007, and such a sale shall be made only to the person who shall hold such lease, his or her assignee, or assigns. No conveyance of the fee simple title to any residential lot shall be made until the lessee of such lot has performed all the obligations regarding the improvement and erection of structures on the lot as are imposed by the lease.

The authority shall not sell any commercial property on which improvements were erected prior to March 1, 1957; and the authority shall not sell any other commercial property unless obligated to do so under the terms of a valid lease agreement entered into prior to May 30, 2007, in which event the commercial property may be sold in the same manner as provided by this part for the sale of leased residential lots.

All sales of residential lots and commercial property shall be made at the conversion price set by the authority in accordance with Code Section 12-3-250, provided that any person who purchases any residential lot sold by the authority shall be entitled to credit on the purchase price to the extent of all payments made by him or his assignors or predecessors in interest on such lease, provided that such credit shall not exceed the purchase price of such lot. If such credit shall equal the purchase price for such lot, the lessee shall be entitled to a conveyance of the fee simple title to such lot, and the authority shall thereupon pay into the state treasury an amount equal to the value of the state's interest in such property as determined as provided in Code Section 12-3-249. The authority shall establish proper reserves to ensure that funds will be available for such purpose.

(c.1)
On and after May 30, 2007, the authority shall not enter into, extend, or renew any agreement providing for the sale of any residential or commercial lot on Jekyll Island, and Code Section 12-3-250 shall not apply to any new, extended, or renewed agreement.

No credit shall be allowed to purchasers of commercial property for any prior rental payments.

(Ga. L. 1957, p. 608, § 3; Ga. L. 2007, p. 711, § 9/HB 214.)

Code Commission notes.

- Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1996, "ensure" was substituted for "insure" in the last sentence of subsection (c).

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 2007, "May 30, 2007" was substituted for "the effective date of this Code section" in subsections (a), (b), and (c.1).

Editor's notes.

- Ga. L. 2007, p. 711,

§

1/HB 214, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: "The Georgia General Assembly finds that Jekyll Island is home to some of the state's most treasured natural and cultural resources and it is the expressed intent of this body to ensure the preservation of these resources for the enjoyment of all Georgians now and for future generations to come. For this reason, the state shall continue its commitment
that not less than 65 percent of the land area of Jekyll Island which lies above water at mean high tide shall remain undeveloped. Jekyll Island proudly displays one of Georgia's
largest stretches of barrier island property. It is the expressed intent of this body that the beach areas of Jekyll Island will remain free and open for the use of the people of the state. Commercial improvement is intended to better existing and future development of the remaining 35 percent of Jekyll Island while retaining public access to the beaches for the pleasure of all of Georgia's citizens. The General Assembly further finds that the deteriorating conditions of public and commercial facilities is of great interest to the legislature and to the public and that by significantly extending the existing lease authority for the island's property, the state will thereby help to secure and encourage future investments and provide a basis for long-term revitalization of the island. Jekyll Island is recognized by this body as 'Georgia's Jewel,' and its remarkable beauties are hereby preserved so that they may continue to shine for all citizens of Georgia."

12-3-248. Subdivision, improvement, lease, or sale of island by authority - Sales of property for which approval by General Assembly is required.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this part, the authority shall under no circumstances sell any real property on Jekyll Island on which a building or buildings were standing at the time the island was leased to the authority, without the express prior approval of the General Assembly to such sale or sales.

(Ga. L. 1957, p. 608, § 3.)

12-3-249. Subdivision, improvement, lease, or sale of island by authority - Publication of schedule of lease rentals; applications exceeding available lots; leasing by negotiation; leases as constituting contracts.

The lots in the various subdivisions created on Jekyll Island by the authority may be leased either singly or in groups deemed appropriate by the authority, only after publication of a complete schedule of the lease rentals applicable to the lots in the official organs of Glynn and Fulton counties.

If at any time the number of acceptable applications for lots received by the authority shall exceed the number of lots available in any one of the property subdivisions created by the authority, a drawing shall be held to determine which of the acceptable applications shall be accepted by the authority for leases upon the available lots, and to determine the sequence in which they will be accepted.

The authority may lease by negotiation any number or all of the existing buildings together with appropriate grounds, provided that the authority may lease by negotiation for commercial purposes any one or a number of the lots it shall set aside for commercial purposes; provided, further, that when in the exercise of its discretion the authority shall offer for lease groups of lots as provided for in Code Section 12-3-246, such blocks may be leased by negotiation.

All such leases granted by the authority shall, upon execution, become a contract between the individual lessee, his approved assigns, the authority, and the State of Georgia.

(Ga. L. 1950, p. 152, § 12; Ga. L. 1952, p. 276, § 3; Ga. L. 1953, Jan.-Feb. Sess., p. 261, § 4.)

12-3-250. Subdivision, improvement, lease, or sale of island by authority - Conversion prices of lots.

Immediately upon the approval of this part, or as soon thereafter as practicable, the authority shall prepare and publish a conversion price for each residential lot then under lease, stating the price at which the lot may be purchased from the authority. Thereafter the authority shall publish at the same time and in the same manner as schedules of lease rentals are published, as required by Code Section 12-3-249, a conversion price for each residential lot that is available for lease. The conversion price for residential lots shall not be less than the appraised value of such lots, taking into consideration the market value of comparable resort property in Glynn County, as determined by an appraisal or appraisals made or to be made by the Glynn County Real Estate Board. Every lease which the authority may grant for a residential lot shall contain therein the conversion price at which the lot may be purchased.

(Ga. L. 1957, p. 608, § 4.)

12-3-251. Subdivision, improvement, lease, or sale of island by authority - Leases to counties for charitable purposes.

The authority is directed, as soon as it deems it feasible to do so, to set aside sufficient land on Jekyll Island to provide a suitable plot for each county in the state for use for charitable purposes.

The authorities having charge of the fiscal affairs of any county desiring to use such plot shall file with the authority a proposal setting forth the use to which such plot is to be placed, the person or persons to have charge and control of the same, and the nature of improvements to be placed thereon. Such proposal shall also disclose how funds are to be secured for the improvement and operation of the facilities.

If the authority deems such proposal to be in the public interest and to the advantage of the state park, it may lease such plot for a period not exceeding 20 years to the fiscal authority of such county or to properly appointed trustees. Such lease shall provide such restrictions, covenants, and conditions as the authority deems proper and shall provide for the termination of the lease upon violation of the provisions of the lease.

Should the authorities having charge of the fiscal affairs of any county fail to claim and present a plan to improve on or before March 1, 1960, the plot of land set aside for such county under this Code section, the authority shall be under no further obligation to furnish any such plot of land on Jekyll Island.

(Ga. L. 1950, p. 152, § 13; Ga. L. 1957, p. 608, § 5.)

12-3-252. Revenue bonds - Issuance by authority; payment of principal and interest from special fund; dating of bonds; determination of rate of interest; medium of payment; redemption before maturity.

The authority, or any authority or body which has succeeded or which may succeed to the powers, duties, and liabilities vested in the authority created by this part, shall have power and is authorized at one time, or from time to time, to provide by resolution for the issuance of negotiable revenue bonds for the purpose of paying all or any part of the cost, as defined in Code Section 12-3-231, of any one or combination of projects. The principal and interest of such revenue bonds shall be payable solely from the special fund provided in Code Section 12-3-264 for such payment. The bonds of each issue shall be dated; shall bear interest at the lowest obtainable rate, payable in such medium of payment as to both principal and interest as may be determined by the authority, and may be made redeemable before maturity, at the option of the authority, at such price or prices and under such terms and conditions as may be fixed by the authority in the resolution providing for the issuance of the bonds.

(Ga. L. 1950, p. 152, § 15; Ga. L. 1960, p. 89, § 1.)

Cross references.

- Revenue bonds generally,

§

36-82-60

et seq.

12-3-253. Revenue bonds - Form of bonds; denominations; place of payment of principal and interest; issuance in coupon or registered form; registration of coupon bonds.

The authority shall determine the form of the bonds, including any interest coupons to be attached thereto, and shall fix the denomination or denominations of the bonds and the place or places of payment of principal and interest thereof, which may be at any bank or trust company within or without the state. The bonds may be issued in coupon or registered form, or both, as the authority may determine, and provision may be made for the registration of any coupon bond as to principal alone and also as to both principal and interest.

(Ga. L. 1950, p. 152, § 17; Ga. L. 1952, p. 276, § 4; Ga. L. 1960, p. 89, § 1.)

12-3-254. Revenue bonds - Signatures; seal.

In case any officer whose signature shall appear on any bonds or whose facsimile signature shall appear on any coupon shall cease to be such officer before the delivery of such bonds, such signature shall nevertheless be valid and sufficient for all purposes the same as if he had remained in office until such delivery. All such bonds shall be signed by the chairman of the authority, and the official seal of the authority shall be affixed thereto and attested by the secretary of the authority; and any coupons attached thereto shall bear the signature or facsimile signature of the chairman of the authority. Any coupon may bear the facsimile signature of such person, and any bond may be signed, sealed, and attested on behalf of the authority by such persons, as at the actual time of the execution of such bonds shall be duly authorized to so sign, seal, or attest or shall hold the proper office, although at the date of such bonds such persons may not have been so authorized or shall not have held such office.

(Ga. L. 1950, p. 152, § 17; Ga. L. 1952, p. 276, § 4; Ga. L. 1960, p. 89, § 1.)

12-3-255. Revenue bonds - Status as negotiable instruments.

All revenue bonds issued under this part shall have and are declared to have all the qualities and incidents of negotiable instruments under the negotiable instruments law of the state.

(Ga. L. 1950, p. 152, § 16; Ga. L. 1960, p. 89, § 1.)

12-3-256. Revenue bonds - Manner of sale; determination of price.

The authority may sell such bonds in such manner and for such price as it may determine to be for the best interests of the authority.

(Ga. L. 1950, p. 152, § 17; Ga. L. 1952, p. 276, § 14; Ga. L. 1960, p. 89, § 1.)

12-3-257. Revenue bonds - Use and manner of disbursement of proceeds; procedure where proceeds are less than or greater than cost of projects.

The proceeds of such bonds shall be used solely for the payment of the cost of the project or combined project and shall be disbursed upon requisition or order of the chairman of the authority under such restrictions, if any, as the resolution authorizing the issuance of the bonds or the trust indenture mentioned in Code Section 12-3-262 may provide. If the proceeds of such bonds, by error of calculation or otherwise, shall be less than the cost of the project or combined project, then unless otherwise provided in the resolution authorizing the issuance of the bonds or in the trust indenture, additional bonds may in like manner be issued to provide the amount of such deficit, which bonds, unless otherwise provided in the resolution authorizing the issuance of the bonds or in the trust indenture, shall be deemed to be of the same issue and shall be entitled to payment from the same fund without preference or priority of the bonds first issued for the same purpose. If the proceeds of the bonds of any issue shall exceed the amount required for the purpose for which such are issued, the surplus shall be paid into the fund provided for in Code Section 12-3-264 for the payment of principal and interest of such bonds.

(Ga. L. 1960, p. 89, § 1.)

12-3-258. Revenue bonds - Issuance of interim receipts, interim certificates, and temporary bonds.

Prior to the preparation of definitive bonds, the authority may, under the restrictions expressed in Code Section 12-3-257, issue interim receipts, interim certificates, or temporary bonds, with or without coupons, which receipts, certificates, or temporary bonds shall be exchangeable for definitive bonds upon the issuance of the latter.

(Ga. L. 1960, p. 89, § 1.)

12-3-259. Revenue bonds - Replacement of mutilated, destroyed, or lost bonds.

The authority may provide for the replacement of any bond which becomes mutilated or is destroyed or lost.

(Ga. L. 1950, p. 152, § 19; Ga. L. 1960, p. 89, § 1.)

12-3-260. Revenue bonds - Bonds of a single issue as payment for one or more projects; immediate effectiveness of resolutions providing for issuance of bonds; time and manner of passage of resolutions.

Revenue bonds may be issued without the conducting of any proceedings, or the satisfaction of any conditions, or the happening of any events other than those proceedings, conditions, and events which are specified or required by this part. In the discretion of the authority, revenue bonds of a single issue may be issued for the purpose of paying the cost of any one or more, including a combination of, projects at any one institution or any number of institutions. Any resolution providing for the issuance of revenue bonds under this part shall become effective immediately upon its passage and need not be published or posted; and any such resolution may be passed at any regular or special or adjourned meeting of the authority by a majority of its members.

(Ga. L. 1960, p. 89, § 1.)

12-3-261. Revenue bonds - Status as constituting debt or pledge of faith and credit of state; effect of issuance on obligation of state to tax or make appropriation; recitals on face of bonds.

Revenue bonds issued under this part shall not be deemed to constitute a debt of the State of Georgia or a pledge of the faith and credit of the state, but such bonds shall be payable solely from the fund provided for in Code Section 12-3-264, and the issuance of such revenue bonds shall not directly, indirectly, or contingently obligate the state to levy or to pledge any form of taxation whatever therefor or to make any appropriation for their payment. All such bonds shall contain recitals on their face covering substantially the foregoing provisions of this Code section. Notwithstanding any other provision of this Code section, such funds as may be received from state appropriations or from any other source are declared to be available and may be used by any department, board, commission, or agency of the State of Georgia for the performance of any lease contract entered into by the department, board, commission, or agency.

(Ga. L. 1950, p. 152, § 16; Ga. L. 1960, p. 89, § 1.)

12-3-262. Revenue bonds - Securing by trust indenture.

In the discretion of the authority, any issue of such revenue bonds may be secured by a trust indenture by and between the authority and a corporate trustee, which may be any trust company or bank having the powers of a trust company within or outside of the state. Such trust indenture may pledge or assign rents, revenues, and earnings to be received by the authority.

Either the resolution providing for the issuance of revenue bonds or the trust indenture may contain such provisions for protecting and enforcing the rights and remedies of the bondholders as may be reasonable and proper and not in violation of law, including covenants setting forth the duties of the authority in relation to the acquisition of property; the construction of the project; the maintenance, operation, repair, and insurance of the project; and the custody, safeguarding, and application of all moneys and may also provide that any project shall be constructed and paid for under the supervision and approval of consulting engineers or architects employed or designated by the authority and satisfactory to the original purchasers of the bonds issued therefor. The resolution or the trust indenture may also require that the security given by contractors and by any depository of the proceeds of the bonds or revenues or other moneys be satisfactory to such original purchasers and may also contain provisions concerning the conditions, if any, upon which additional revenue bonds may be issued.

It shall be lawful for any bank or trust company incorporated under the laws of this state to act as such depository and to furnish such indemnifying bonds or pledge such securities as may be required by the authority.

The trust indenture may set forth the rights and remedies of the bondholders and of the trustee and may restrict the individual right of action of bondholders as is customary in trust indentures securing bonds and debentures of corporations.

In addition to the foregoing, the trust indenture may contain such other provisions as the authority may deem reasonable and proper for the security of the bondholders.

All expenses incurred in carrying out the trust indenture may be treated as a part of the cost of maintenance, operation, and repair of the project affected by the indenture.

(Ga. L. 1950, p. 152, §§ 19, 20; Ga. L. 1960, p. 89, § 1.)

12-3-263. Revenue bonds - Payment of proceeds to trustee.

The authority shall, in the resolution providing for issuance of revenue bonds or in the trust indenture, provide for the payment of the proceeds of the sale of the bonds to any officer, person, agency, bank, or trust company. The recipient so designated by the authority shall act as trustee of such funds and shall hold and apply the same to the purposes enumerated in this part, subject to such regulations as this part and such resolution or trust indenture may provide.

(Ga. L. 1950, p. 152, § 20; Ga. L. 1960, p. 89, § 1.)

12-3-264. Revenue bonds - Pledging and allocating funds to payment of bonds; establishment of sinking fund for payment of principal, interest, and other costs.

The revenues, rents, and earnings derived from any particular project or combined projects; any and all funds from any source received by any department, board, commission, or agency of the State of Georgia and pledged and allocated by it to the authority as security for the performance of any lease or leases; or any and all revenues, rents, and earnings received by the authority, regardless of whether or not such rents, earnings, and revenues were produced by a particular project for which bonds have been issued, may, unless otherwise pledged and allocated, be pledged and allocated by the authority to the payment of the principal and interest on revenue bonds of the authority as the resolution authorizing the issuance of the bonds or the trust instrument may provide.

Such funds so pledged from whatever source received, which pledge may include funds received from one or more or all sources, shall be set aside at regular intervals as may be provided in the resolution or trust indenture into a sinking fund, which sinking fund shall be pledged to and charged with the payment of:

The interest upon such revenue bonds as such interest shall fall due;

The principal of the bonds as the same shall fall due;

The necessary charges of paying agents for paying principal and interest; and

Any premium upon bonds retired by call or purchase.

The use and disposition of such sinking fund shall be subject to such regulations as may be provided in the resolution authorizing the issuance of the revenue bonds or in the trust indenture, but, except as may otherwise be provided in such resolution or trust indenture, such sinking fund shall be a fund for the benefit of all revenue bonds without distinction or priority of one over another.

Subject to the provisions of the resolution authorizing the issuance of the bonds or in the trust indenture, surplus moneys in the sinking fund may be applied to the purchasing or redemption of bonds, and any such bonds so purchased or redeemed shall forthwith be canceled and shall not again be issued.

(Ga. L. 1960, p. 89, § 1.)

12-3-265. Revenue bonds - Remedies of bondholders, coupon holders, and trustees.

Any holder of revenue bonds or interest coupons issued under this part, any receiver for such holders, or any indenture trustee, if there are any, except to the extent the rights given in this Code section may be restricted by resolution passed before the issuance of the bonds or by the trust indenture, may either at law or in equity, by action, mandamus, or other proceedings, protect and enforce any and all rights under the laws of the State of Georgia or granted by this Code section or under such resolution or trust indenture and may enforce and compel performance of all duties required by this part or by resolution or trust indenture to be performed by the authority, or any officer thereof, including the fixing, charging, and collecting of revenues, rents, and other charges for the use of the project or projects.

In the event of default of the authority upon the principal and interest obligations of any revenue bond issue, any such bondholder, receiver, or trustee shall be subrogated to each and every right, specifically including the contract rights of collecting rental, which the authority may possess against the state or any department, agency, or institution of the state; and in the pursuit of its remedies as subrogee, any such bondholder, receiver, or trustee may proceed either at law or in equity by action, mandamus, or other proceedings to collect any sums by such proceedings due and owing to the authority and pledged or partially pledged directly or indirectly to the benefit of the revenue bond issue of which the individual, receiver, or trustee is representative.

No bondholder, receiver, or trustee shall have the right to compel any exercise of the taxing power of the state to pay any such bond or the interest thereon, or to enforce the payment thereof against any property of the state, nor shall any such bond constitute a charge, lien, or encumbrance, legal or equitable, upon the property of the state.

Any provision of this part or any other Code section to the contrary notwithstanding, any such bondholder or receiver or indenture trustee shall have the right by appropriate legal or equitable proceedings, including, without being limited to, mandamus, to enforce compliance by the appropriate public officials of the provisions of Article VII, Section IV of the Constitution of Georgia, and permission is given for the institution of any such proceedings to compel the payment of lease obligations.

(Ga. L. 1950, p. 152, § 20; Ga. L. 1960, p. 89, § 1; Ga. L. 1964, p. 100, § 2; Ga. L. 1983, p. 3, § 49.)

12-3-266. Revenue bonds - Revenue refunding bonds.

The authority is authorized to provide by resolution for the issuance of revenue refunding bonds of the authority for the purpose of refunding any revenue bonds issued under this part and then outstanding, together with accrued interest thereon. The issuance of such revenue refunding bonds, the maturities and all other details thereof, the rights of the holders thereof, and the duties of the authority in respect to the same shall be governed by the foregoing provisions of this part insofar as the same may be applicable.

(Ga. L. 1950, p. 152, § 15; Ga. L. 1960, p. 89, § 1.)

12-3-267. Revenue bonds - Status as legal investment and as securities for deposits.

The bonds authorized by this part are made securities in which all public officers and bodies of this state; all municipalities and all municipal subdivisions; all insurance companies and associations and other persons carrying on an insurance business; all banks, bankers, trust companies, savings banks, and savings associations, including savings and loan associations, building and loan associations, investment companies, and other persons carrying on a banking business; all administrators, guardians, executors, trustees, and other fiduciaries; and all other persons whatsoever who are now or may hereafter be authorized to invest in bonds or other obligations of the state may properly and legally invest funds, including capital in their control or belonging to them. The bonds are also made securities which may be deposited with and shall be received by all public officers and bodies of this state and all municipalities and municipal subdivisions for any purpose for which the deposit of the bonds or other obligations of this state is now or may hereafter be authorized.

(Ga. L. 1960, p. 89, § 1.)

12-3-268. Revenue bonds - Protection of bondholders; part as constituting a contract with bondholders.

While any of the bonds issued by the authority remain outstanding, the powers, duties, or existence of the authority, or of its officers, employees, or agents, or of any department, board, commission, or agency of the state, shall not be diminished or impaired in any manner that will affect adversely the interests and rights of the holders of such bonds. No other entity, department, agency, or authority will be created which will compete with the authority to such an extent as to affect adversely the interests and rights of the holders of such bonds, nor will the state itself so compete with the authority. This part shall be for the benefit of the state, the authority, and the holders of any such bonds and, upon the issuance of bonds under the provisions of this part, shall constitute a contract with the holders of such bonds.

(Ga. L. 1950, p. 152, § 22; Ga. L. 1960, p. 89, § 1.)

12-3-269. Revenue bonds - Validation.

Bonds of the authority shall be confirmed and validated in accordance with the procedure provided by Article 3 of Chapter 82 of Title 36. The petition for validation shall also make party defendant to such action any authority, subdivision, instrumentality, or agency of the State of Georgia which has contracted with the Jekyll Island - State Park Authority for the use of any building, structure, or facilities for which bonds have been issued and sought to be validated. Such authority, subdivision, instrumentality, or agency shall be required to show cause, if any, why such contract or contracts and the terms and conditions thereof should not be inquired into by the court, the validity of the terms thereof determined, and the contract adjudicated as security for the payment of any such bonds of the authority. The bonds when validated and the judgment of validation shall be final and conclusive with respect to such bonds and against the authority issuing the same and any authority, subdivision, instrumentality, department, or agency contracting with the authority.

(Ga. L. 1950, p. 152, § 18; Ga. L. 1960, p. 89, § 1.)